Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5145.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 31-1-3 and 31-1-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-1 entitled
"Definitions and General Code Provisions" are hereby amended to read as follows:
31-1-3. Types of vehicles.
(a)(1) “Antique motor car” means any motor vehicle that is more than twenty-five (25)
years old. Unless fully inspected and meeting inspection requirements, the vehicle may be
maintained solely for use in exhibitions, club activities, parades, and other functions of public
interest. The vehicle may also be used for limited enjoyment and purposes other than the previously
mentioned activities, but may not be used primarily for the transportation of passengers or goods
over any public highway.
(2) After the vehicle has met the requirements of state inspection, a registration plate may
be issued to it on payment of the standard fee. The vehicle may be operated on the highways of this
and other states, and may, in addition to the registration plate, retain the designation “antique” and
display an “antique plate.”
(3) For any vehicle that is more than twenty-five (25) years old, the division of motor
vehicles may also issue or approve, subject to rules and regulations that may be promulgated by
the administrator, a “year of manufacture plate” for the vehicle that is an exact replica plate
designating the exact year of manufacture of the vehicle. The year of manufacture plate, as
authorized by this subsection, need only be attached to the rear of the vehicle.

(b)(1) “Antique motorcycle” means any motorcycle that is more than twenty-five (25)
years old. Unless fully inspected and meeting inspection requirements, the vehicle shall be
maintained solely for use in exhibitions, club activities, parades, and other functions of public
interest. The vehicle may also be used for limited enjoyment and purposes other than the previously
mentioned activities, but may not be used primarily for the transportation of passengers or goods
over any public highway; and
(2) After the vehicle has met the requirements of state inspection, a registration plate may
be issued to it, on payment of the standard fee, and the vehicle may be operated on the highways
of this and other states, and may, in addition to the registration plate, retain the designation
“antique” and display an “antique plate.”
(c) “Authorized emergency vehicle” means vehicles of the fire department (fire patrol);
police vehicles; vehicles of the department of corrections while in the performance of official
duties; vehicles used by the state bomb squad within the office of state fire marshal; vehicles of
municipal departments or public service corporations designated or authorized by the administrator
as ambulances and emergency vehicles; and privately owned motor vehicles of volunteer
firefighters or privately owned motor vehicles of volunteer ambulance drivers or attendants, as
authorized by the department chief or commander and permitted by the Rhode Island Association
of Fire Chiefs and Rhode Island Association of Police Chiefs Joint Committee for Volunteer
Warning Light Permits.
(d) “Automobile” means, for registration purposes, every motor vehicle carrying
passengers other than for hire., to include trucks that have a gross vehicle weight of eight thousand
pounds (8,000 lbs.) or less.
(e) “Bicycle” means every vehicle having two (2) tandem wheels, except scooters and
similar devices, propelled exclusively by human power, and upon which a person may ride.
(f) “Camping recreational vehicle” means a vehicular type camping unit, certified by the
manufacturer as complying with ANSI A119.2 Standards, designed primarily as temporary living
quarters for recreation that has either its own motor power or is mounted on, or towed by, another
vehicle. The basic units are tent trailers, fifth-wheel trailers, motorized campers, travel trailers, and
pick-up campers.
(g) “Electric motorized bicycle”, also called an “electric bicycle”, as defined in § 31-19.7-
1, means a two-wheel (2) vehicle that may be propelled by human power or electric motor power,
or by both, with an electric motor rated not more than two (2) (S.A.E.) horsepower, that is capable
of a maximum speed of not more than twenty-eight miles per hour (28 m.p.h.).
(h) “Electric personal assistive mobility device” (“EPAMD”) is a self-balancing, non-
LC000635 - Page 2 of 8

tandem two-wheeled (2) device, designed to transport only one person, with an electric propulsion
system that limits the maximum speed of the device to fifteen miles per hour (15 m.p.h.).
(i) “Fifth-wheel trailer”: A towable recreational vehicle, not exceeding four hundred (400)
square feet in area, designed to be towed by a motorized vehicle that contains a towing mechanism
that is mounted above or forward of the tow vehicle’s rear axle and that is eligible to be registered
for highway use.
(j) “Hearse” means every motor vehicle used for transporting human corpses. A hearse
shall be considered an automobile for registration purposes.
(k) “Jitney or bus” means: (1) A “public bus” that includes every motor vehicle, trailer,
semi-trailer, tractor trailer, or tractor trailer combination, used for the transportation of passengers
for hire, and operated wholly or in part upon any street or highway as a means of transportation
similar to that afforded by a street railway company, by indiscriminately receiving or discharging
passengers, or running on a regular route or over any portion of one, or between fixed termini; or
(2) A “private bus” that includes every motor vehicle other than a public bus or passenger van
designed for carrying more than ten (10) passengers and used for the transportation of persons, and
every motor vehicle other than a taxicab designed and used for the transportation of persons for
compensation.
(l) “Kei car” or “Kei truck” means every motor vehicle of the keijidōsha class of imported
vehicles, including, but not limited to, mini-trucks, microvans, and Kei cars imported pursuant to
49 U.S.C. § 30112(b)(9), having four (4) wheels, an engine displacement of six hundred sixty cubic
centimeters (660 cc) or less, an overall length of one hundred thirty inches (130″) or less, an overall
height of seventy-eight inches (78″) or less, and an overall width of sixty inches (60″) or less.
(m) “Low-speed motor vehicle” or “low-speed vehicle” means a motor vehicle defined in
49 C.F.R. § 571.3 as a vehicle that is four (4) wheeled, whose speed attainable in one mile is more
than twenty miles per hour (20 m.p.h.) and not more than twenty-five miles per hour (25 m.p.h.)
on a paved level surface, is electric, and whose gross vehicle weight rating is less than three
thousand pounds (3,000 lbs.). All low-speed motor vehicles shall comply with the standards
established in 49 C.F.R. § 571.500, as amended, and pursuant thereto, shall be equipped with
headlamps, front and rear turn signal lamps, tail lamps, stop lamps, an exterior mirror mounted on
the driver’s side of the vehicle and either an exterior mirror mounted on the passenger’s side of the
vehicle or an interior mirror, a parking brake, a windshield that conforms to the federal standards
on glazing materials, a vehicle identification number that conforms to the requirements of 49 C.F.R.
pt. 565 for such numbers, a Type 1 or Type 2 seat belt assembly conforming to 49 C.F.R. § 571.209,
installed at each designated seating position, and reflex reflectors; provided, that one reflector is
LC000635 - Page 3 of 8

red on each side as far to the rear as practicable and one reflector is red on the rear. A low-speed
motor vehicle that meets the requirements of 49 C.F.R. § 571.500, as amended, and is equipped as
herein provided, may be registered in this state, subject to inspection and insurance requirements.
(n) “Motorcycle” means only those motor vehicles having not more than three (3) wheels
in contact with the ground and a saddle on which the driver sits astride, except bicycles with helper
motors as defined in subsection (p) of this section.
(o) “Motor-driven cycle” means every motorcycle, including every motor scooter, with a
motor of no greater than five (5) horsepower, except bicycles with helper motors as defined in
subsection (p) of this section.
(p) “Motorized bicycles” means two-wheel (2) vehicles that may be propelled by human
power or helper power, or by both, with a motor rated not more than four and nine-tenths (4.9)
horsepower and not greater than fifty cubic centimeters (50 cc), that are capable of a maximum
speed of not more than thirty miles per hour (30 m.p.h.).
(q) “Motorized camper”: A camping recreational vehicle, built on, or permanently attached
to, a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis cab or van that is an integral part of the completed vehicle.
(r) “Motorized tricycles” means tricycles that may be propelled by human power or helper
motor, or by both, with a motor rated no more than 1.5 brake horsepower that is capable of a
maximum speed of not more than thirty miles per hour (30 m.p.h.).
(s) “Motorized wheelchair” means any self-propelled vehicle, designed for, and used by, a
person with a disability that is incapable of speed in excess of eight miles per hour (8 m.p.h.).
(t) “Motor scooter” means a motor-driven cycle with a motor rated not more than four and
nine-tenths (4.9) horsepower and not greater than fifty cubic centimeters (50 cc) that is capable of
a maximum speed of not more than thirty miles per hour (30 m.p.h.).
(u) “Motor vehicle” means every vehicle that is self-propelled or propelled by electric
power obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails, except vehicles moved
exclusively by human power, an EPAMD and electric motorized bicycles as defined in subsection
(g) of this section, and motorized wheelchairs.
(v) “Motor vehicle for hire” means every motor vehicle other than jitneys, public buses,
hearses, and motor vehicles used chiefly in connection with the conduct of funerals, to transport
persons for compensation in any form, or motor vehicles rented for transporting persons either with
or without furnishing an operator.
(w) “Natural gas vehicle” means a vehicle operated by an engine fueled primarily by
natural gas.
(x) “Park trailer”: A camping recreational vehicle that is eligible to be registered for
LC000635 - Page 4 of 8

highway use and meets the following criteria: (1) Built on a single chassis mounted on wheels; and
(2) Certified by the manufacturer as complying with ANSI A119.5.
(y) “Passenger van” means every motor vehicle capable of carrying ten (10) to fourteen
(14) passengers plus an operator and used for personal use or on a not-for-hire basis. Passenger
vans may be used for vanpools, transporting passengers to and from work locations, provided that
the operator receives no remuneration other than free use of the vehicle.
(z) “Pedal carriage” (also known as “quadricycles”) means a nonmotorized bicycle with
four (4) or more wheels operated by one or more persons for the purpose of, or capable of,
transporting additional passengers in seats or on a platform made a part of or otherwise attached to
the pedal carriage. The term shall not include a bicycle with trainer or beginner wheels affixed to
it, nor shall it include a wheelchair or other vehicle with the purpose of operation by or for the
transportation of a person with a disability, nor shall it include a tricycle built for a child or an adult
with a seat for only one operator and no passenger.
(aa) “Pick-up camper”: A camping recreational vehicle consisting of a roof, floor, and sides
designed to be loaded onto and unloaded from the back of a pick-up truck.
(bb) “Rickshaw” (also known as “pedi cab”) means a nonmotorized bicycle with three (3)
wheels operated by one person for the purpose of, or capable of, transporting additional passengers
in seats or on a platform made a part of, or otherwise attached to, the rickshaw. This definition shall
not include a bicycle built for two (2) where the operators are seated one behind the other, nor shall
it include the operation of a bicycle with trainer or beginner wheels affixed thereto, nor shall it
include a wheelchair or other vehicle with the purpose of operation by or for the transportation of
a person with a disability.
(cc) “School bus” means every motor vehicle owned by a public or governmental agency,
when operated for the transportation of children to or from school; or privately owned, when
operated for compensation for the transportation of children to or from school.
(dd) “Suburban vehicle” means every motor vehicle with a convertible or interchangeable
body or with removable seats, usable for both passenger and delivery purposes, and including motor
vehicles commonly known as station or depot wagons or any vehicle into which access can be
gained through the rear by means of a hatch or trunk and where the rear seats can be folded down
to permit the carrying of articles as well as passengers.
(ee) “Tent trailer”: A towable recreational vehicle that is mounted on wheels and
constructed with collapsible partial side walls that fold for towing by another vehicle and unfold
for use and that is eligible to be registered for highway use.
(ff) “Trackless trolley coach” means every motor vehicle that is propelled by electric power
LC000635 - Page 5 of 8

obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not operated on rails.
(gg) “Travel trailer”: A towable recreational vehicle, not exceeding three hundred twenty
square feet (320 sq. ft.) in area, designed to be towed by a motorized vehicle containing a towing
mechanism that is mounted behind the tow vehicle’s bumper and that is eligible to be registered
for highway use.
(hh) “Vehicle” means every device in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may
be transported or drawn upon a highway, except devices used exclusively upon stationary rails or
tracks.
31-1-4. Trucks and tractors.
(a) “Covered heavy-duty tow and recovery vehicle” means a vehicle that is transporting a
disabled vehicle from the place where the vehicle became disabled to the nearest appropriate repair
facility; and, provided the vehicle has a gross vehicle weight that is equal to or exceeds the gross
vehicle weight of the disabled vehicle being transported.
(b) “Farm tractor” means every motor vehicle designed and used primarily as a farm
implement, for drawing plows, mowing machines, and other implements of husbandry or farm
vehicles.
(c) “Tow cars and tow trucks” means every motor vehicle ordinarily used for the purpose
of towing or removing motor vehicles or assisting disabled motor vehicles.
(d)(1) “Trailer transporter towing unit” means a power unit that is not used to carry property
when operating in a towaway trailer transporter combination.
(2) “Towaway trailer transporter combination” means a combination of vehicles consisting
of a trailer transporter towing unit and two (2) trailers or semitrailers:
(i) With a total weight that does not exceed twenty-six thousand pounds (26,000 lbs.); and
(ii) In which the trailers or semitrailers carry no property and constitute inventory property
of a manufacturer, distributor, or dealer of the trailers or semitrailers.
(e) “Truck” means every motor vehicle designed, used, or maintained primarily for the
transportation of property. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall determine, in
case of doubt, if a motor vehicle is subject to registration as a truck. Provided however, any truck
with a gross vehicle weight of eight thousand pounds (8,000 lbs.) or less may be registered as an
automobile and issued passenger plates.
(f) “Truck tractor” means a non-cargo-carrying power unit that operates in combination
with a semi-trailer or trailer, except that a truck tractor and a semi-trailer or trailer engaged in the
transportation of automobiles may transport motor vehicles on part of the power unit.
LC000635 - Page 6 of 8

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000635
========
LC000635 - Page 7 of 8